District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.33

Transition.

For a period of 2 years following March 16, 2005, all references in this chapter to anesthesiologist assistants shall be deemed to refer to persons meeting the requirements for licensure in the District, regardless of whether they are licensed in fact.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 633
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-237, § 2(h), 51 DCR 10593